en: blended scotch whisky
de: Blended Scotch Whisky
fi: skotlantilainen blended-viski
hr: miješani škotski viski
it: whisky scozzese miscelato

en: Irish whiskey
de: Irischer Whiskey
fi: irlantilainen viski
fr: whisky irlandais
hr: irski viski
hu: ír whiskey
it: whisky irlandese

en: calvados
xx: calvados
de: Calvados
hr: kalvados

en: rum
xx: rum
bg: ром
da: rom
de: Rum
es: ron
fi: rommi
fr: rhum
ja: ラム酒
ru: ром
sv: rom

en: white rum
bg: бял ром
da: hvid rom
de: weißer Rum
fi: vaalea rommi
fr: Rhum blanc
hr: bijeli rum
hu: fehér rum
it: rum bianco
nl: witte rum

en: dark rum
bg: тъмен ром
ca: rom negre
da: mørk rom
de: dunkler Rum
es: ron oscuro
fi: tumma rommi
fr: rhum brun
hr: tamni rum
hu: sötét rum
it: rum scuro
ja: ダークラム
nl: donkere rum
pl: ciemny rum
pt: rum escuro
ru: темный ром
sv: mörk rom

en: armagnac
xx: armagnac
de: Armagnac
fi: armanjakki
ja: アルマニャック

en: beer
bg: бира
ca: cervesa
da: øl
de: Bier
es: Cerveza
fi: olut
fr: bière
hr: pivo
hu: sör
it: birra
nl: Bier
pl: piwo
ru: Пиво
sl: pivo

en: absinthe, absinth
de: Absinth
es: absenta
fi: absintti
fr: absinthe
hr: absint
hu: abszint
it: Assenzio
nl: absinth
pl: Absynt
pt: absinto

en: Chartreuse liqueur
de: Chartreuse Likör
fr: Liqueur de Chartreuse, liqueur Chartreuse, liqueur de Chartreuse verte
hr: chartreuse liker
it: liquore Chartreuse

en: sake, sake wine
de: Reiswein
es: sake, vino sake
fr: Saké
hr: sake
it: sakè
ja: 日本酒

en: rakia
hr: rakija
it: rakia

en: rakia sugar
hr: šećer rakija
it: zucchero Rakia

en: rice wine
bg: оризово вино
ca: vi d'arròs
es: vino de arroz
fr: Alcool de riz
hr: vino od riže
it: vino di riso
nl: rijstwijn
ru: рисовое вино

en: vodka
xx: vodka
bg: водка
de: Wodka
hr: votka
nl: wodka
ru: водка

en: flavouring, flavour, flavor, flavoring, aroma, flavours, flavors, flavourings, flavorings, aromas
bg: аромат, аромати, ароматизант, ароматизанти
bs: aroma
ca: Aromes, aroma
cs: Aroma, aromata
da: smagsstof, smagstoffer, aroma, aromaer
de: Aroma, Aromen, Aromas
el: αρωματικό
es: aroma, aromas, aromatizante, aromatizantes, sustancias-aromatizantes, saborizante, saborizantes
et: lõhna- ja maitseaine, lõhna- ja maitseained, aroomiaine, lõhnaained
fi: aromi, aromit, aromeja, aromiaine, aromiaineet, aromiaineita, makuaineet
fr: arôme, arômes
he: חומרי טעם
hr: aroma, arome, aromatiziranje
hu: aroma, aromák
is: bragðefni
it: aroma, aromi
ja: 香料
lt: kvapioji medžiaga, kvapiosios medžiagos
lv: aromatizētājs, aromatizētāji
mk: арома
nb: aroma, aromaer, smakstilsetninger
nl: aroma, aroma's, smaakstof, smaakstoffen, aromas
no: aroma
pl: aromat, aromaty, aromat z, aromaty z
pt: aromatizante, aroma, aromas
ro: aromă, aroma, arome
sk: aróma
sl: arome, aroma
sv: arom, aromer, smakämnen, aromämne, aromämnen, aroma
zh: 调味剂

en: green tea flavour
de: Grüntee-Aroma

en: flavouring preparation, spice preparation
de: Gewürzzubereitung, Aromaextrakte
es: Preparación de aromas.
fi: aromivalmiste, maustevalmiste, aromisekoitus, maustamisvalmiste, makuvalmiste
fr: préparation aromatisante, préparation aromatique
hr: pripravak za aromu
hu: fűszerkészítmény
it: preparazione di spezie
lv: aromatizējošais preparāts
nl: aromatiserende bereiding
pl: preparat aromatyzujący, preparaty aromatyzujące, preparaty aromatyczne, preparat aromatyczny, środek aromatyzujący
pt: preparacao aromatizante
ro: preparat aromatizant
ru: вкусоароматические вещества и препараты
sv: smakberedning

en: natural flavouring, natural flavour, natural flavor, natural flavoring, natural flavourings, natural flavorings, natural flavours, natural flavors, natural aroma, natural aromas
bg: натурален аромат, натурални ароматизанти, натурален ароматизант, естествен ароматизант, естествени ароматизанти, натурални аромати, натурален ароматизатор, естествени овкусители, натурални овкусители
ca: Aroma natural, aromes naturals
cs: přírodní aroma, přirodni aromata
da: naturlig aroma, naturlige smagsstoffer, naturlige aromaer
de: natürliches Aroma, natürliche Aromen, natürliche Aromastoffe
es: aroma natural, aromas naturales, saborizante natural
fi: luontainen aromi, luontaiset aromit, luonnollinen aromi, luonnolliset aromit, luontaisia aromeja
fr: arôme naturel, arômes naturels
he: חומרי טעם טבעיים
hr: prirodna aroma, prirodne arome, arome prirodne
hu: természetes aroma, természetes aromák, természetazonos aroma, természetazonos aromák
is: náttúruleg bragðefni
it: aroma naturale, aromi naturali
lt: natūralios kvapiosios medžiagos
lv: dabīgs aromatizētājs, dabīgi aromatizētāji
mk: природна арома
nb: naturlig aroma
nl: Natuurlijke smaakstoffen, natuurlijke smaak, natuurlijk aroma, natuurlijke aroma's
pl: Naturalny aromat, naturalne aromaty, aromat naturalny, aromaty naturalne
pt: aroma natural, aromas naturais, sabores naturais
ro: aromă naturală, aroma naturala, arome naturale
ru: Натуральный ароматизатор, ароматизатор натуральный, натуральные ароматизаторы, ароматизаторы натуральные, натуральные вкусоароматические вещества
sl: naravna aroma, naravne arome
sr: prirodne arome
sv: naturlig arom, naturliga aromer, naturlig smakämne, naturliga smakämnen, naturligt smakämne, naturliga aromämnen, naturliga smaker
zh: 天然调味剂

en: natural nutweg flavour
nl: natuurlijk nootmuskaataroma